Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1116.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Study of PFAS Chemicals in Biosolids Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Biosolid." As follows:(1) Liquid or solid sludge or other residue from a municipal sewage collection and treatment system or from septic and holding tank pumpings from a commercial, institutional or residential establishment. The term includes a material derived from sewage sludge.1234567891011121314151617 (2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Ash generated during the firing of sewage sludge in a sewage sludge incinerator.(ii) Grit and screenings generated during the preliminary treatment of sewage sludge at a municipal sewage collection and treatment system.(iii) Grit, screenings and nonorganic objects from septic and holding tank pumpings."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."PFAS chemical." A fluorinated organic chemical that contains any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. The term includes any of the following:(1) Perfluorooctanoic acid.(2) Perfluorooctane sulfonic acid.(3) Perfluorohexanesulfonic acid.(4) Perfluorononanoic acid.(5) Hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid.(6) Perfluorobutane sulfonic acid.Section 3. Duty of department to conduct study on PFAS chemicals in biosolids.(a) Study.--The department shall conduct a study on PFAS chemicals in biosolids that are authorized by the department for use in this Commonwealth. The department shall include all of the following in the study:(1) A testing of the concentrations of PFAS chemicals in biosolids used for land application on farmland.(2) A testing and comparison of the concentrations of 20250HB1116PN1238 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PFAS chemicals in the soil and water on and near farmland where biosolids are land applied and the concentrations of PFAS chemicals in the soil and water on and near farmland where no biosolids are land applied.(3) An analysis of the source of the biosolids used for land application on the farmland specified under paragraphs (1) and (2).(4) An analysis of the potential pathways for contamination of the food supply for humans with PFAS chemicals resulting from the land application of biosolids, which shall include an examination of all of the following:(i) The uptake for PFAS chemicals on crops grown on fields where biosolids are land applied and grown for human or animal consumption.(ii) An examination of PFAS chemicals in the blood of livestock and poultry fed with crops grown on farmland on which biosolids are land applied.(iii) An examination of PFAS chemicals in the milk produced by livestock fed with crops grown on farmland on which biosolids are land applied.(5) An examination and cost analysis of different testing methods for concentrations of PFAS chemicals in biosolids.(6) An examination and cost analysis of different treatment methods for reducing the concentrations of PFAS chemicals in biosolids.(7) An examination of the laws and regulations of other states regarding requirements for testing or treatment for PFAS chemicals in land-applied biosolids.(b) Coordination.--The department shall coordinate with the 20250HB1116PN1238 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Agriculture, the State Conservation Commission and institutions of higher education as necessary to complete the study under subsection (a).Section 4. Report on study.No later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall:(1) Present a report detailing the results of the study under section 3(a) to:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate. (ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) Make the report available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1116PN1238 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223